test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-v1_antaa_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - antaa - ok : # Verb 'to live' - ei tsekattu!
     antaa+V+Inf: antaa
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: annan
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: annat
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: antaa
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: annama
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: annatta
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: antava
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: annoin
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: annoit
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [antoi, anto]
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: annoima  # anniima ?!
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: annoitta
     antaa+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [annoit, antoiva, annethiin]
     antaa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: antanu
     antaa+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: annettu # antaa+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom annetut
     antaa+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [antanheet, antahneet]
     antaa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: antava
     antaa+V+Act+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: antavat
     antaa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: annettava
     antaa+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: annettavat
  
     antaa+V+Act+Cond+Sg1: [antaisin, antasin]
     antaa+V+Act+Cond+Sg2: [antaisit, antasit]
     antaa+V+Act+Cond+Sg3: [antais, antas]
     antaa+V+Act+Cond+Pl1: [antaisimma, antasimma]
     antaa+V+Act+Cond+Pl2: [antaisitta, antasitta]
     antaa+V+Act+Cond+Pl3: [antaisit, antaisiva, antasit, antasiva]
     antaa+V+Pass+Cond: [annettais, annettas]
  
     antaa+V+Act+Imprt+Sg2: anna
     antaa+V+Act+Imprt+Pl2: antakaa
     
     antaa+V+InfMa+Ine: antamassa
    #antaa+V+Act+InfMa+Ine: antamassa osv borttaget
     antaa+V+InfMa+Ela: antamasta
     antaa+V+InfMa+Ill: [antamhaan, antahmaan, anthaan]
     antaa+V+InfMa+Ade: antamalla
     antaa+V+InfMa+Abe: antamatta

#Verb tietää
     tietää+V+Inf: tietää
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: tiän
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: tiät
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: tietää
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: tiämä
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: tiättä
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: tietävä

     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: tiesin
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: tiesit
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: tiesi
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: tiesimä
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: tiesittä
     tietää+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [tiesit, tiesivä, tiethiin]

     tietää+V+Pass+Cond: tiettäis


#Verb arvata
arvata+V+Inf: arvata
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1: arvaan 
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2: arvaat 
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3: arvaa
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1: arvaama 
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2: arvaatta
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3: arvaava 
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: arvaa
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1: arvasin 
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2: arvasit 
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3: arvasi 
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1: arvasimma
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2: arvasitta
arvata+V+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3: arvasit
arvata+V+InfE+Ine: arvatessa
arvata+V+InfE+Ins: arvaten
arvata+V+InfMa+Ill: [arvaahmaan, arvaamhaan]
arvata+V+InfMa+Ine: arvaamassa  
arvata+V+InfMa+Ela: arvaamasta  
arvata+V+InfMa+Ade: arvaamalla  
arvata+V+InfMa+Abe: arvaamatta  
arvata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: arvanu 
arvata+V+Act+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: [arvahneet, arvanheet]
arvata+V+Pass+Ind+Prs: arvathaan   
arvata+V+Pass+Ind+Prt: arvathiin   
arvata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Sg+Nom: arvattu 
arvata+V+Pass+PrfPrc+Pl+Nom: arvatut 
arvata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom: arvattava   
arvata+V+Pass+PrsPrc+Pl+Nom: arvattavat  
arvata+V+Pass+Cond: arvattais   
